Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 27 BUSINESS AND INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT CORPORATIONS
§ 26-2718. BIDCO acquiring another firm — Application — Requirements.

Either by itself or in concert with a director, officer, principal shareholder, or affiliate; another licensee; or a director, officer, principal shareholder, or affiliate of another licensee, a licensee shall not hold control of a business firm, except as follows:

If and to the extent necessary to protect the licensee’s interest as creditor of, or investor in, the business firm, a licensee that had provided financing assistance to a business firm may acquire and hold control of that business firm. Unless the director approves a longer period, a licensee holding control of a business firm under this subdivision shall divest itself of the interest which constitutes holding control as soon as practicable or within three (3) years after acquiring that interest, whichever is sooner.

With the approval of the director, a licensee may acquire and hold control of a corporation which is licensed as a small business investment company under the small business investment act of 1958, Public Law 85-699, 72 Stat. 689 or any successor statute.

With the approval of the director, a licensee may acquire and hold control of a company which is a local development company in accordance with the small business investment act of 1958, whether or not such a development company is or may become certified by the small business administration under section 503 of the small business investment act of 1958, 15 U.S.C. section 697 or any successor statute.

With the approval of the director, a licensee may acquire and hold control of another business firm which is engaged in no business other than the business of providing financing assistance and management assistance to business firms.

With the approval of the director, a licensee may acquire and hold control of a business firm not referred to in paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection. The director shall not approve an application under this subdivision [paragraph] unless the director determines that such an approval will not cause the amount of the licensee’s investments in business firms covered by this subdivision [paragraph] to exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the amount of the assets of the licensee and that in the director’s judgment such an approval will promote the purposes of this chapter. An approval by the director under this subdivision [paragraph] shall be for a period of not more than three (3) years, except that in a particular case the director may subsequently extend the period beyond three (3) years if the director determines that a longer period is needed and is consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

If the director fails to issue an order approving or denying an application under subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section, within forty-five (45) days from receipt by the director of an application which complies with section 26-2704, Idaho Code, the application shall be considered approved by the director.

For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, “hold control” means ownership, directly or indirectly, of record or beneficially, of voting securities greater than:

For a business firm with outstanding voting securities held by fewer than fifty (50) shareholders, forty percent (40%) of the outstanding voting securities.

For a business firm with outstanding voting securities held by fifty (50) or more shareholders, twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding voting securities.
(4) If a licensee anticipates acquiring and holding control of a business firm under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the licensee shall file with the director a plan for acquiring and holding control of the business firm that shall include at least all of the following:

The licensee’s proposed course of action upon obtaining control of the business firm.

The length of time the licensee anticipates it will be necessary to hold control of the business firm.

(a) The reasons it is necessary for the licensee to acquire and hold control of the business firm.

(b) The percentage of outstanding voting securities of the business firm the licensee plans to own.

(5) The director may require the licensee to demonstrate the necessity for the licensee to hold control of a business firm under subsection (1)(a) of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2718, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 7, p. 406.

§ 26-2719. Sound business practices required.

A licensee shall transact its business in a safe and sound manner and shall maintain itself in a safe and sound condition.

In determining whether a licensee is transacting business in a safe and sound manner or has committed an unsafe or unsound act, the director shall not consider the risk of a provision of financing assistance to a business firm, unless the director determines that the risk is so great compared with the realistically expected return as to demonstrate gross mismanagement.

The provisions of subsection (2) of this section do not limit the authority of the director to do any of the following:

Determine that a licensee’s financing assistance to a single business firm or a group of affiliated business firms is in violation of subsection (1) of this section or constitutes an unsafe or unsound act, if the amount of that financing assistance is unduly large in relation to the total assets or the total shareholders equity of the licensee.

Require that a licensee maintain a reserve in the amount of anticipated losses.

Require that a licensee have in effect a written financing assistance policy, approved by its board of directors, including credit evaluation and other matters. The director shall not require that a licensee adopt a financing assistance policy that contains standards which prevent the licensee from exercising needed flexibility in evaluating and structuring financing assistance to business firms on a deal by deal basis.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2719, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2720. Conflict of interest — Defined.

For purposes of this section:

“Associate” means that term as defined in section 26-2702, Idaho Code.

“Relative” means parent, child, sibling, spouse, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, brother-in-law, daughter-in-law, sister-in-law, grandparent, grandchild, nephew, niece, uncle, or aunt.

If a licensee provides financing assistance to a business firm or engages in another business transaction, and if that financing assistance or transaction involves a potential conflict of interest, the terms and conditions under which the licensee provides the financing assistance or engages in the transaction shall not be less favorable to the licensee than the terms and conditions that would be required by the licensee in the ordinary course of business if the transaction did not involve a potential conflict of interest. Each person who participates in the decision of the licensee relating to a transaction described in this section and has knowledge of a potential conflict of interest involving that transaction shall disclose the potential conflict of interest in the financing documents of the transaction or, for a business transaction not involving financing assistance, in another appropriate document.

For the purposes of subsection (2) of this section, transactions engaged in by a licensee which involve a potential conflict of interest include, but are not limited to, the following:

Providing financing assistance to a principal shareholder of the licensee, to a person controlled by a principal shareholder of the licensee, or to a director, officer, partner, relative, controlling person, or affiliate of a principal shareholder of the licensee.

Providing financing assistance to a business firm to which a principal shareholder of the licensee: a director, officer, partner, relative, controlling person, or affiliate of a principal shareholder of a licensee, or a person controlled by a principal shareholder of the licensee provides or plans to provide contemporaneous financing assistance.

Providing financing assistance to a business firm which has or is expected to have a substantial business relationship with another business firm which has a director, officer, or controlling person who is also a director, officer, or controlling person of the licensee or who is the spouse of a director, officer, or controlling person of the licensee.

Providing financing assistance to a business firm if that business firm, or a director, officer, or controlling person of that business firm, contemporaneously has lent or will lend money to an associate of the licensee.

Providing financing assistance for the purchase of property of an associate or principal shareholder of the licensee.

Selling or otherwise transferring any of its assets to an associate or principal shareholder of the licensee.

Nothing in this section or in any other section of this chapter limits the authority of the director to determine that an act involves a conflict of interest and therefore is an unsafe or unsound act.

Except with the approval of the director, a licensee shall not provide a lien on or security interest in any of its property for the purpose of securing an obligation of, or an obligation incurred for the benefit of, another person.

History.
I.C.,§ 26-2720, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 8, p. 406.

§ 26-2721. Acquisition of BIDCO — Approval required.

Without the prior approval of the director, a person shall not acquire control of a licensee.

With respect to an application for approval to acquire control of a licensee, if the director determines, that the applicant and the directors and officers of the applicant are of good character and sound financial standing; that it is reasonable to believe that, if the applicant acquires control of the licensee, the applicant will comply with this chapter; and that the applicant’s plans, if any, to make a major change in the business, corporate structure, or management of the licensee are not detrimental to the safety and soundness of the licensee, the director shall approve the application. If, after notice and a hearing, the director determines otherwise, the director shall deny the application.

For purposes of subsection (2) of this section, the director may determine any of the following:

That an applicant or a director or officer of an applicant is not of good character if that person has been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, a crime involving fraud or dishonesty.

That an applicant’s plan to make a major change in the management of a licensee is detrimental to the safety and soundness of the licensee if the plan provides for a person to become a director or officer of the licensee and that person has been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, a crime involving fraud or dishonesty.

The conditions described in subsection (3) of this section are not the only conditions upon which the director may determine that an applicant or a director or an officer of an applicant is not of good character or that an applicant’s plan to make a major change in the management of a licensee is detrimental to the safety and soundness of the licensee.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2721, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2722. Merger — Requirements — Applications.

A licensee shall not merge with another corporation unless:

The licensee is the surviving corporation and the merger is approved by the director.

The licensee is a disappearing corporation, the surviving corporation is a licensee and the merger is approved by the director.

A licensee shall not purchase all or substantially all of the business of another person unless the purchase is approved by the director.

A licensee shall not sell all or substantially all of its business or of the business of any of its offices to another person unless that other person is a licensee and the sale is approved by the director.

The director shall approve an application for approval of a merger, purchase, or sale, if, and only if, the director determines all of the following:

That the merger, purchase, or sale will be safe and sound with respect to the acquiring licensee.

That, upon consummation of the merger, purchase, or sale, it is reasonable to believe that the acquiring licensee will comply with this chapter.

That the merger, purchase, or sale will not have a major detrimental impact on competition in the providing of financial assistance or management assistance to business firms, or if there will be such a detrimental impact, the merger, purchase, or sale is necessary in the interests of the safety and soundness of any of the parties to the merger, purchase, or sale, or is otherwise, on balance, in the public interest.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2722, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2723. Violation of chapter — Director’s powers — Hearings — Cease and desist.

If in the opinion of the director, a person violates, or there is reasonable cause to believe that a person is about to violate the provisions of this chapter, the director may bring an action in the district court to enjoin the violation or to enforce compliance with the provisions of this chapter. Upon a showing that a person has engaged in or is about to engage in, an act or practice constituting a violation of the provisions of this chapter, a restraining order, preliminary or permanent injunction, or writ of mandamus shall be granted, and a receiver or a conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets. The court shall not require the director to post a bond in an action brought under this chapter.

If the director finds that a person has violated or that there is reasonable cause to believe that a person is about to violate the provisions of section 26-2711, Idaho Code, the director may order the person to cease and desist from the violation unless and until the person is issued a license.

Within thirty (30) days after an order is issued under subsection (2) of this section, the person to whom the order is directed may file with the director an application for a hearing on the order. If the director fails to commence a hearing within fifteen (15) business days after that application is filed or within a longer period to which the person consents, the order shall be considered rescinded. Upon the conclusion of the hearing, the director shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order. A person to whom an order is directed under subsection (2) of this section may petition for judicial review of the order in conformance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

If, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing, the director determines that a licensee or a subject person of a licensee has violated or is violating, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that a licensee or subject person of a licensee is about to violate this chapter or another applicable law, or that a licensee or subject person of a licensee has engaged or participated or is engaging or participating, or that there is a reasonable cause to believe that a licensee or subject person of a licensee is about to engage or participate in an unsafe or unsound act with respect to the business of that licensee, the director may order that licensee or subject person to cease and desist from the action or violation. The order may require the licensee or subject person to take affirmative action to correct any condition resulting from the action or violation.

If the director determines that any of the factors set forth in subsection (4) of this section are true with respect to a licensee or subject person of a licensee and that the action or violation is likely to cause the insolvency of or substantial dissipation of the assets or earnings of the licensee; is likely to seriously weaken the condition of the licensee; or is likely to otherwise seriously prejudice the interests of the licensee before the completion of proceedings conducted under subsection (4) of this section, the director may order the licensee or subject person to cease and desist from that action or violation. The order may require the licensee or subject person to take affirmative action to correct any condition resulting from the action or violation.
(6) Within thirty (30) days after an order is issued under subsection (5) of this section, the licensee or subject person of a licensee to whom the order is directed may file with the director an application for a hearing on the order. If the director fails to commence a hearing within fifteen (15) business days after the application is filed or within a longer period to which the licensee or subject person consents, the order shall be considered rescinded. Upon the hearing, the director shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order. A licensee or subject person to whom an order is directed under subsection (5) of this section may petition for judicial review of the order pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

(7) If the director finds that a licensee has failed to comply with the provisions of section 26-2717(5), Idaho Code, the director shall revoke the certification of eligible equity investment and shall so notify the licensee promptly.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2723, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 9, p. 406.

§ 26-2724. Violation of chapter — Removal of subject person.

The director may issue an order removing a subject person of a licensee from his office, if any, with the licensee and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee, if, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing, the director determines all of the following are true:

The subject person has violated the provisions of this chapter or another applicable law; the subject person has engaged or participated in an unsafe or unsound act with respect to the business of the licensee; or the subject person has engaged or participated in an act which constitutes a breach of the subject person’s fiduciary duty.

The act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty has caused or is likely to cause substantial financial loss or other damage to the licensee or has seriously prejudiced or is likely to seriously prejudice the interests of the licensee, or the subject person has received financial gain by reason of the act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty.

The act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty either involves dishonesty on the part of the subject person or demonstrates the subject person’s gross negligence with respect to the business of the licensee or a willful disregard for the safety and soundness of the licensee.

The director may issue an order removing the subject person from his office with the licensee, if any, and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee, except with the prior consent of the director, if, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing, the director determines that, by engaging or participating in an act with respect to a financial or other business institution which resulted in substantial financial loss or other damage, the subject person of a licensee has demonstrated both of the following:

Dishonesty or willful or continuing disregard for the safety and soundness of the financial or other business institution.

Unfitness to continue as a subject person of the licensee or to participate in conducting the business of the licensee.

If the director determines that the factors set forth in subsection (1) or (2) of this section are true with respect to a subject person of a licensee, and that it is necessary for the protection of the interest of the licensee or for the protection of the public interest that the director immediately suspend the subject person from his or her office, if any, with the licensee and prohibit the subject person from further participating in any manner in conducting the business of the licensee, the director may issue an order suspending the subject person from his or her office, if any, with the licensee and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in conducting the business of the licensee, except with the consent of the director.

Within thirty (30) days after an order is issued under subsection (3) of this section, the subject person of a licensee to whom the order is directed may file with the director an application for a hearing on the order. If the director fails to begin a hearing within fifteen (15) business days after the application is filed or within a longer period to which the subject person consents, the order shall be considered rescinded. Upon the conclusion of the hearing, the director shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order. A subject person of a licensee to whom an order is issued under subsection (3) of this section may petition for judicial review of the order pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

A person to whom an order is directed under this section may apply to the director to modify or rescind the order. The director shall not modify or rescind the order unless the director determines that it is in the public interest to do so and that it is reasonable to believe that the person, if and when he or she becomes a subject person of a licensee, will comply with this chapter.

As used in this section, “office,” if used with respect to a licensee, means the position of director, officer, or employee of the licensee or of a subsidiary of the licensee.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2724, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 10, p. 406.

§ 26-2725. Indictment or conviction of a crime — Removal of subject person.

If the director determines that a subject person of a licensee has been indicted by a grand jury or has been bound over for trial by a court for a crime involving dishonesty or breach of trust, and that the fact that the person continues to be a subject person of the licensee may threaten the interests of the licensee or may threaten to impair public confidence in the licensee, the director may issue an order suspending the subject person from his office, if any, with the licensee and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee, except with the consent of the director.

If the director determines that a subject person or former subject person of a licensee to whom an order was directed under subsection (1) of this section, or another subject person of a licensee, has been convicted of, entered a plea of guilty to, has been found guilty of a crime which is punishable by imprisonment for a term of not less than one (1) year and which involves dishonesty or breach of trust, and that the fact that the person continues to be or will resume to be a subject person of the licensee may threaten the interests of the licensee or may threaten to impair public confidence in the licensee, the director may issue an order suspending or removing the subject person or former subject person from his office, if any, with the licensee and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee, except with the prior consent of the director.

Within thirty (30) days after an order is issued under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the subject person of a licensee to whom the order is directed may file with the director an application for a hearing on the order. If the director fails to commence a hearing within fifteen (15) business days after the application is filed or within a longer period to which the subject person consents, the order shall be considered rescinded. Upon the conclusion of the hearing, the director shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order. A subject person or former subject person of a licensee to whom an order is directed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may petition for judicial review of the order pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

The fact that a subject person of a licensee charged with a crime involving dishonesty or breach of trust is not convicted of the crime shall not preclude the director from issuing an order concerning the subject person under any other provision of this chapter.

A person to whom an order is directed under this section may apply to the director to modify or rescind the order. The director shall not modify or rescind the order unless the director determines that it is in the public interest to do so and that it is reasonable to believe that the person, if and when he or she becomes a subject person of a licensee, will comply with this chapter.

As used in this section, “office,” if used with respect to a licensee, means the position of director, officer, or employee of the licensee or of a subsidiary of the licensee.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2725, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 11, p. 406.

§ 26-2726. Disclosure to shareholders — Board of directors.

If, in the opinion of the director, disclosure to shareholders regarding a matter is warranted, the director may require a licensee, in such a form and manner as the director may specify, to disclose to the shareholders of a licensee the results of a communication or order from the director addressed to the licensee or to a subject person of the licensee.

If the director considers it expedient, the director may call a meeting of the board of directors of a licensee by giving notice of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting not less than five (5) days before the meeting to each director either by personal service or by registered or certified mail sent to the director’s last known address as shown in the records of the director.

If the director considers it expedient, the director may call a meeting of the shareholders of a licensee by giving notice of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting not less than five (5) days before the meeting to each shareholder either by personal service or by registered or certified mail sent to the shareholder’s last known address as shown by the books of the licensee. The licensee shall pay the expenses of the notice and of a meeting called under this subsection.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2726, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2727. Order to refrain from offering financial assistance — Conditions — Hearing.

The director may issue an order directing a licensee to refrain from providing any additional financing assistance and management assistance to business firms if, in the opinion of the director, the order is necessary to protect the interest of the licensee or the public interest, and if, after notice and a hearing, the director determines that any of the following are true:

The licensee or a controlling person, subsidiary, or affiliate of the licensee has violated the provisions of this chapter or another applicable law.

The licensee is conducting its business in an unsafe and unsound manner.

The licensee is in a condition that makes it unsafe or unsound for the licensee to transact business.

The licensee has ceased to transact business as a business and industrial development corporation.

The licensee is insolvent.

The licensee has suspended payment of its obligations, has made an assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or has admitted in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due.

The licensee has applied for an adjudication of bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, or other relief under a bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, or moratorium law, or that a person has applied for such relief under such a law against a licensee and the licensee has by any affirmative act approved of or consented to the action or such relief has been granted.

A fact or condition exists which would have been grounds for denying the application if the fact or condition had existed at the time the licensee applied for its license.

If the director determines that any of the factors set forth in subsection (1) of this section are true with respect to a licensee and that it is necessary for the protection of the interests of the licensee or the public interest that the director immediately issue an order directing the licensee to refrain from providing any additional financing assistance and management assistance to business firms, the director may issue such an order without a hearing. Within thirty (30) days after an order is issued under this subsection, the licensee to whom the order is directed may file with the director a request for a hearing on the order. If the director fails to commence a hearing within fifteen (15) business days after the request is filed or within a longer period to which the licensee consents, that order shall be considered rescinded. Upon the conclusion of the hearing, the director shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order.

With the consent of the director, a licensee which has been the subject of an order under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may resume providing financing assistance and management assistance to business firms under such conditions as the director may prescribe.

A person to whom an order is directed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may apply to the director to modify or rescind the order. The director shall not grant the application unless the director determines that it is in the public interest to do so and that it is reasonable to believe that the person, if and when the order is modified or rescinded, will comply with this chapter.
History.

I.C.,§ 26-2727, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 12, p. 406.

§ 26-2728. Appointment of trustee — Liquidation of the BIDCO — Procedure.

If the director finds that any of the factors set forth in section 26-2727, Idaho Code, are true with respect to a licensee and that it is necessary for the protection of the interests of the licensee or for the protection of the public interest that the director take immediate possession of the property and business of the licensee, the director may appoint a conservator for the licensee. The director may appoint as conservator one (1) of the employees of the department or some other competent and disinterested person. The department shall be reimbursed out of the assets of the conservatorship for all sums expended by the department in connection with the conservatorship as expenses. Upon the approval of the director, the expenses of the conservatorship shall be paid out of the assets of the licensee. The expenses shall be a first charge upon the assets and shall be fully paid before any final distribution is made.

Under the direction of the director, the conservator shall take possession of the books, records, and assets of the licensee and shall take such action with respect to employees, agents, or representatives of the licensee or any other action as may be necessary to conserve the assets of the licensee or ensure payment of obligations of the licensee pending further disposition of its business as provided by law. At any appropriate time, the director may terminate the conservatorship and permit the licensee to resume the transaction of its business subject to the terms, conditions, restrictions and limitations the director may prescribe.

If in the opinion of the director it is appropriate that the licensee be liquidated, the director may apply to the district court for the county in which the principal office of the licensee is located for the appointment of a receiver for the licensee, if the director determines that any of the following are true:

The licensee is insolvent.

The licensee has suspended payment of its obligations, has made an assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or has admitted in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due.

The licensee has applied for an adjudication of bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, or other relief under a bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, or moratorium law.

A person has applied for the relief described under paragraph (c) against any licensee and that licensee has by an affirmative act approved of or consented to the action or the relief has been granted.

The licensee is in a condition that makes it unsafe or unsound for the licensee to transact business.

If a receiver is appointed under subsection (3) of this section, the receiver shall liquidate the property and business of the licensee in the manner provided for in chapter 10, title 26, Idaho Code, as if the licensee were a bank.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2728, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2729. Violation of chapter — Civil penalties.

If, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing, the director finds that a person has violated the provisions of this chapter, he may order that person to pay to the director a civil penalty in the amount the director specifies. However, the amount of the civil penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation, or in the case of a continuing violation, one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day during which the violation continues. Money collected for a civil penalty under this section shall be deposited into the finance administrative account pursuant to section 67-2702, Idaho Code.

The provisions of this section do not apply to any act committed or omitted in good faith in conformity with an order, rule, declaratory ruling, or written interpretative opinion of the director, notwithstanding that the order, rule, declaratory ruling, or written interpretative opinion is later amended, rescinded, or repealed, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are additional to, and not alternative to, other provisions of this chapter which authorize the director to issue orders or to take other action on account of a violation of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2729, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 13, p. 406.

§ 26-2730. Prohibited acts — Exceptions — Penalties.

A person shall not willfully make an untrue statement of a material fact in an application or report filed with the director under this chapter, or willfully omit to state in such an application or report a material fact required to be stated in the application or report.

A person having custody of any of the books, accounts, or other records of a licensee shall not willfully refuse to allow the director, upon request, to inspect or make copies of any of those books, accounts, or other records.

A person shall not, with intent to deceive a director, officer, employee, auditor, or attorney of a licensee, the director or a governmental agency, make a false entry in the books, accounts, or other records of that licensee; omit to make an entry in those books, accounts, or other records which that person is required to make, or alter, conceal, or destroy any of those books, accounts, or other records.

A licensee shall not provide, directly or indirectly, financing assistance to an associate of the licensee.

A licensee shall not provide, directly or indirectly, financing assistance to discharge, or to free other money for use in discharging, in whole or in part, an obligation to an associate of that licensee. This section does not apply to a transaction effected by an associate of a licensee in the normal course of that associate’s business involving a line of credit or short-term financing assistance.

A licensee shall not provide, directly or indirectly, financing assistance to a business firm to which an associate of that licensee provides financing assistance, either contemporaneously with, or within one (1) year before or after, the providing of financing assistance by the licensee, if the terms on which the licensee provides financing assistance are less favorable to the licensee than the terms on which the associate provides financing assistance to the business firm. If the financing assistance provided by the associate of the licensee is of a different kind from the financing assistance provided by the licensee, the burden shall be on the licensee to prove that the terms on which the licensee provided financing assistance were at least as favorable to the licensee as the terms on which the associate provided financing assistance to the business firm.

This section does not apply to any of the following:

If the associate is a controlling person of the licensee and is also the only shareholder of the licensee.

If the associate is a subsidiary of the licensee.

A transaction effected by an associate of a licensee in the normal course of that associate’s business involving a line of credit or short-term financing assistance.

The fees for the services are collected by the licensee on behalf of the associate.

An associate of a licensee shall not receive, directly or indirectly, from a person to whom that licensee provides financing assistance, compensation in connection with the providing of that financing assistance or anything of value for procuring, influencing, or attempting to procure or influence the licensee’s action with respect to the providing of the financing assistance. This section does not apply to the receipt of fees by an associate of a licensee for bona fide closing services performed by that associate if all of the following are true:
(a) The associate, with the consent and knowledge of the person to whom the financing assistance is provided, is designated by the licensee to perform the services.

By such orders or rules the director considers necessary and appropriate, he may exempt from the provisions of subsections (4) through (8), either unconditionally or upon specified terms and conditions and for specified periods, a person or transaction or class of persons or transactions, if the director finds that the exemption is in the public interest and that the regulation of the person, transaction or class is not necessary for the purposes of this chapter.

In exempting a person or transaction or class of persons or transactions, the director shall give consideration, as considered appropriate by the director, to conflict of interest provisions of federal law or regulation that may be applicable to that person or transaction governing participants in federal financing programs.

A person who knowingly commits an act which violates the provisions of this chapter shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or shall be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or both.

The provisions of this section do not apply to an act committed or omitted in good faith in conformity with an order, rule, declaratory ruling, or written interpretative opinion of the director, notwithstanding that the order, rule, declaratory ruling, or written interpretative opinion is later amended, rescinded, or repealed, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

Nothing in this chapter limits the power of the state to punish a person for an act which constitutes a crime under any statute.

(b) The services are appropriate and necessary in the circumstances.

(c) The fees for the services are approved as reasonable by the licensee.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2730, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.